Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.130

Milk for children at school expense.

The board of directors of any school district may cause to be furnished free of charge, in a suitable receptacle on each and every school day to such children in attendance desiring or in need of the same, not less than one-half pint of milk. The cost of supplying such milk shall be paid for in the same manner as other items of expense incurred in the conduct and operation of said school, except that available federal or state funds may be used therefor.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.31.020. Prior: 1935 c 15 s 1; 1923 c 152 s 1; 1921 c 190 s 1; RRS s 4806. Formerly RCW 28A.31.020, 28.31.020.]

NOTES:

Food services—Use of federal funds: Chapter 28A.235 RCW.